Wisconsin, session 2025, AB238.
do enact as follows:AB238,11Section 1. 106.52 (1) (ce) of the statutes is created to read:AB238,2,32106.52 (1) (ce) “Dog handler” means an individual who is trained to work with 3a search and rescue dog.AB238,24Section 2. 106.52 (1) (fe) of the statutes is created to read:AB238,2,75106.52 (1) (fe) “Search and rescue dog” means a dog that is trained or is being 6trained by a state or nationally recognized search and rescue agency to locate lost or 7missing individuals and victims of disasters in search and rescue activities.AB238,38Section 3. 106.52 (3) (as) of the statutes is created to read:AB238,2,109106.52 (3) (as) 1. In this paragraph, “hotel,” “inn,” and “motel” have the 10meaning given for “hotel” in s. 97.01 (7).AB238,2,11112. Subject to subds. 3. to 6., no person may do any of the following:AB238,3,31a. Refuse to allow entrance into, or use of, or otherwise deny the full and equal 2enjoyment of a hotel, inn, or motel to a dog handler because the dog handler is 3accompanied by a search and rescue dog.AB238,3,74b. Charge an individual a higher price than the regular rate, including a 5deposit or surcharge, for the full and equal enjoyment of a hotel, inn, or motel 6because the individual is a dog handler and is accompanied by a search and rescue 7dog.AB238,3,148c. Directly or indirectly publish, circulate, display, or mail any written 9communication that the communicator knows is to the effect that entrance into, or 10use of, or the full and equal enjoyment of any of the facilities of the hotel, inn, or 11motel will be denied to an individual because the individual is a dog handler 12accompanied by a search and rescue dog or that the patronage of such an individual 13is unwelcome, objectionable, or unacceptable because the individual is accompanied 14by a search and rescue dog.AB238,3,21153. The prohibitions specified in subd. 2. apply only if the dog accompanying 16the dog handler is wearing a harness or cape that indicates that the dog is a search 17and rescue dog and the search and rescue dog is leashed. Subdivision 2. does not 18prohibit a dog handler who is accompanied by a dog from being asked whether the 19dog is a search and rescue dog and does not prohibit the dog handler from being 20required to produce a certification or other credential that verifies that the dog is a 21search and rescue dog.AB238,4,5224. A person may exclude a search and rescue dog from a hotel, inn, or motel if 23accommodation of the search and rescue dog would result in a fundamental 1alteration in the nature of the accommodations provided or would jeopardize the 2safe operation of the hotel, inn, or motel. If a search and rescue dog must be 3separated from the dog handler accompanying the search and rescue dog, it is the 4responsibility of that dog handler to arrange for the care and supervision of the 5search and rescue dog during the period of separation.AB238,4,865. A dog handler who is accompanied by a search and rescue dog in a hotel, 7inn, or motel is liable for sanitation with respect to the search and rescue dog and 8damage to the establishment caused by the search and rescue dog.AB238,4,1696. A hotel, inn, or motel shall modify its policies, practices, and procedures to 10permit the full and equal enjoyment of the hotel, inn, or motel by a dog handler who 11is accompanied by a search and rescue dog. Those policies, practices, and 12procedures shall ensure that a dog handler who is accompanied by a search and 13rescue dog is not separated from the search and rescue dog, that the search and 14rescue dog is allowed to accompany the dog handler to all areas of the hotel, inn, or 15motel that are open to the general public, and that the dog handler is not segregated 16from other patrons of the hotel, inn, or motel.AB238,4,1717